Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-502
Officer; extra compensation prohibited; exception.

No officer shall receive any pay or perquisites from a city of the first class other than his or her salary, as provided by ordinance and the law relating to cities of the first class, and the city council shall not pay or appropriate any money or any valuable thing to any person not an officer for the performance of any act, service, or duty, the doing or performance of which shall come within the proper scope of the duties of any officer of such city, unless the money or valuable thing is specifically appropriated and ordered by a vote of three-fourths of all the members elected to the city council.

Laws 1901, c. 18, §45, p. 244;

R.S.1913, § 4901;

C.S.1922, § 4069;

C.S.1929, § 16-502;

R.S.1943, § 16-502;

Laws 1957, c. 38, § 2, p. 207;

Laws 1959, c. 62, § 1, p. 279;

Laws 1961, c. 283, § 2, p. 830;

Laws 1971, LB 491, § 3;

Laws 1972, LB 1209, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 24, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 370, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 77;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 29.

For other provisions of officers interested in public contracts, see sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.07.

Contracts between officer and city are void, and amount paid officer can be recovered. Arthur v. Trindel, 168 Neb. 429, 96 N.W.2d 208 (1959).

Salary of clerk was the limit of city clerk's compensation for official services of all kinds. City of Scottsbluff v. Southern Surety Co., 124 Neb. 260, 246 N.W. 346 (1933).

Under former law, the fact that a mayor and member of city council may have been subscribers for stock of the water company and such stock subscriptions were still unpaid, did not void a judgment of the water company against such city, where such city officers were no longer stockholders of such water company. City of Broken Bow v. Broken Bow Water-Works Company, 57 Neb. 548, 77 N.W. 1078 (1899).

Under former law, where a contract was made between the contractor and the city and a member of the city council was a stockholder and officer of the corporation, such contract was illegal and a taxpayer could enjoin the same. McElhinney v. City of Superior, 32 Neb. 744, 49 N.W. 705 (1891).

Under former law, a contract could be canceled at suit of taxpayer where one of the members of the council was also a stockholder in and officer of the corporation contracting with the city, but city must pay for the reasonable value of the services received prior to the commencement of the action. Grand Island Gas Company v. West, 28 Neb. 852, 45 N.W. 242 (1890).